Utah statutes.
12-1-10.   Applications -- Fees.
(1)  Each application for registration under this chapter shall be made on a
form provided by the Division of Corporations and Commercial Code.
(2)  Each applicant shall pay to the Division of Corporations and Commercial
Code an application fee determined under Section 63J-1-504.
